test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VTA_AM_IMP_waabam_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTA+Imp - AM - waabmaa :
     
  #Template Key
  #NO TEMPLATE
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+1: waabmishin  #2sg v 1sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl: waabmishnaang  #2sg v 1pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+Pl+1+Pl: waabmishnaang  #2pl v 1pl !2v1pl ambig elsewhere...
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+Pl+1: waabmishik  #2pl v 1sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+3: waabam  #2sg v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+3: waabmin  #2sg v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+3+Pl: waabam  #2sg v 3pl 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+3+Pl: waabmin  #2sg v 3pl 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl+3: waabmaadaa  #21pl v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl+3+Pl: waabmimiinaadaanik  #21pl v 3pl 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+Pl+3: waabmik     #2pl v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Imm+2+Pl+3+Pl: waabmik  #2pl v 3pl 

     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2+1: waabmishkan  #2sg v 1sg
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2+1+Pl: UNKNOWN  #2sg v 1pl
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2+Pl+1+Pl: UNKNOWN  #2pl v 1pl !2v1pl ambig elsewhere...
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2+Pl+1: waabmishiikek  #2pl v 1sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2+3: waabmaakan  #2sg v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2+3+Pl: waabmaakan  #2sg v 3pl 
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2+1+Pl+3: UNKNOWN  #21pl v 3sg 
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2+1+Pl+3+Pl: UNKNOWN  #21pl v 3pl 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2+Pl+3: waabmaakek     #2pl v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Del+2+Pl+3+Pl: waabmimiinaakek  #2pl v 3pl 

     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+1: waabmishke  #2sg v 1sg
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl: UNKNOWN  #2sg v 1pl
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+Pl+1+Pl: UNKNOWN  #2pl v 1pl !2v1pl ambig elsewhere...
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+Pl+1: waabmishkego  #2pl v 1sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+3: waabmaake  #2sg v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+3+Pl: waabmaake  #2sg v 3pl 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl+3: waabmaasiidaa  #21pl v 3sg 
     waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl+3+Pl: waabmaasiidaanig  #21pl v 3pl 
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+Pl+3: UNKNOWN     #2pl v 3sg 
     #waabmaa+VTA+Imp+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: UNKNOWN  #2pl v 3pl 
